Massachusetts, session 194th, S1945.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 64C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding at
the end of the first paragraph the following language:
Whenever used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms
shall have the following meanings -
"Oral Nicotine Product" means any noncombustible product containing nicotine that is in
the form of a solid, gum or paste that is intended for human consumption or placement in the oral
cavity for absorption into the human body by any means other than inhalation. Oral Nicotine
Products are not a substitute for tobacco nor is any oral nicotine product included in the
definition of a tobacco product, smokeless tobacco, electronic nicotine delivery system, cigarette,
or any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug Administration
under Chapter V of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section XX of said chapter 64C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following subsection:-
(X) An excise tax shall be imposed on all Oral Nicotine Products held in the
commonwealth at the rate of two dollars ($2.00) per ounce, and a proportionate tax at the same
rate on all fractional parts of an ounce, calculated based upon the product weight as listed by the
manufacturer. If the tax calculated for a fractional part of an ounce carried to the third decimal
place being greater than four (4), the amount of the tax shall be rounded to the next additional
cent. The tax imposed on a can or package of Oral Nicotine Products that weighs less than 1
ounce is equal to the amount of the tax imposed on a can or package of an Oral Nicotine Product
that weighs 1 ounce.
This excise tax shall be imposed on Oral Nicotine Product distributors at the time Oral
Nicotine Products are manufactured, purchased, imported, received or acquired in the
commonwealth. This excise shall not be imposed on any Oral Nicotine Products that (i) are
exported from the Commonwealth; or (ii) are not subject to taxation by the Commonwealth
pursuant to any law of the United States.
Chapters 62C of the General Laws and 64C of the General Laws relative to the
assessment, collection, payment, abatement, verification and administration of taxes, including
penalties, shall apply to the excise imposed by this section.
of 2